Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 2. Incorporation and Organization.

§ 81-14-51.
Hearings.

Any hearing required to be held by this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with applicable provisions as prescribed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-53.
Application of chapter on business corporations.

All the provisions of law relating to private corporations operating in this state which are not inconsistent with this chapter, or with the proper business of depository institutions, shall be applicable to all state savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-55.
Scope and prohibitions; existing charters; injunctions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate any charter that was valid prior to the enactment of this chapter. Any savings bank chartered pursuant to this chapter shall use the letters “SSB” in its legal name.

Except as provided in subsection (1), no person or group of persons, nor any corporation, company or savings bank that is not incorporated and licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or federal law to operate a savings bank shall operate as a savings bank. Unless so authorized as a state or federal savings bank and engaged in transacting a depository institution business, no person or group of persons, nor any corporation, company or savings bank domiciled and doing business in this state shall:

Use in its name the term “savings bank” or words of similar import or connotation that lead the public reasonably to believe that the business so conducted is that of a savings bank; or

Use any sign, or circulate or use any letterhead, billhead, circular or paper whatsoever, or advertise or communicate in any manner, that would lead the public reasonably to believe that it is conducting the business of a savings bank.

Upon application by the commissioner or by any savings bank, a court of competent jurisdiction may issue an injunction to restrain any person or entity from violating any of the foregoing provisions of subsection (2).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-57.
Application to organize savings bank.

Any five (5) or more natural persons (hereinafter referred to as “incorporators”), a majority of whom shall be domiciled in this state, may make application to organize a savings bank in order to promote the purpose of this chapter. The incorporators shall file with the commissioner a preliminary application to organize a state savings bank in the form to be prescribed by the commissioner, together with the proper nonrefundable application fee.

The application to organize a state savings bank shall be received by the commissioner not less than sixty (60) days prior to the scheduled consideration of the application by the board, and it shall contain:

The original and two (2) copies of the certificate of incorporation, signed by a majority of the original incorporators, which shall not be less than five (5), and properly acknowledged by a person duly authorized by this state to take proof of acknowledgment of deeds;

The names and addresses of the incorporators and the initial members of the board of directors;

Statements of the anticipated receipts, expenditures, earnings and financial condition of the savings bank for its first three (3) years of operation, or such longer period as the commissioner may require;

A showing satisfactory to the board that:

The public convenience and advantage will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank;

There is a reasonable demand and necessity in the community which will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank;

The proposed savings bank will have a reasonable probability of sustaining profitable and beneficial operations within a reasonable time in the community in which the proposed savings bank intends to locate;

The proposed savings bank will promote healthy and effective competition in the community by the delivery to the public of savings institution services;

The proposed bylaws;

Statements, exhibits, maps and other data which may be prescribed or required by the commissioner, which data shall be sufficiently detailed so as to enable the commissioner to pass upon the criteria set forth in this article.

The application shall be signed by a majority of the original incorporators, which shall not be less than five (5), and shall be properly acknowledged by a person duly authorized by this state to take proof and acknowledgment of deeds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-59.
Certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation of a proposed mutual savings bank shall set forth:

The name of the savings bank which shall not closely resemble the name of an existing depository institution doing business under the laws of this state so as to mislead the public;

The county and city or town where its principal office will be located in this state; and the name of its registered agent and the address of its registered office, including county and city or town, and street and number;

The period of duration, which may be perpetual. When the certificate of incorporation fails to state the period of duration, it shall be considered perpetual;

The purpose for which the savings bank is organized which shall be limited to purposes permitted under the laws of this state for savings banks;

The amount of the entrance fee per deposit account based upon the amount pledged;

The minimum amount on deposit in deposit accounts before it shall commence business;

Any provision, not inconsistent with this chapter, and the proper operation of a savings bank, which the incorporators shall set forth in the certificate of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the savings bank;

The number of directors, which shall not be less than five (5), constituting the initial board of directors (which may be classified in the certificate of incorporation) and the name and address of each person who is to serve as a director until the first meeting of members, or until his successor is duly elected;

The names and addresses of the incorporators.

The certificate of incorporation of a proposed stock savings bank shall set forth:

The name of the savings bank which shall not closely resemble the name of an existing depository institution doing business under the laws of this state so as to mislead the public;

The county and city or town where its principal office will be located in this state; and the name of its registered agent and the address of its registered office, including county and city or town, and street and number;

The period of duration which may be perpetual. When the certificate of incorporation fails to state the period of duration, it shall be considered perpetual;

The purposes for which the savings bank is organized, which shall be limited to purposes permitted under the laws of this state for savings banks;

With respect to the shares of stock which the savings bank shall have authority to issue:

If the stock is to have a par value, the number of such shares of stock and the par value of each;

If the stock is to be without par value, the number of such shares of stock;

If the stock is to be divided into classes, or into series within a class of preferred or special shares of stock, the certificate of incorporation shall also set forth a designation of each class, with a designation of each series within a class, and a statement of the preferences, limitations and relative rights of the stock of each class or series;

The minimum amount of consideration to be received for its shares of stock before it shall commence business;

A statement as to whether stockholders have preemptive rights to acquire additional or treasury shares of the savings bank;

Any provision not inconsistent with this chapter or the proper operation of a savings bank, which the incorporators shall set forth in the certificate of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the savings bank;

The number of directors, which shall not be less than five (5), constituting the initial board of directors (which may be classified in accordance with provisions in the certificate of incorporation) and the name and address of each person who is to serve as a director until the first meeting of the stockholders, or until his successor is duly elected;

The names and addresses of the incorporators.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-61.
Commissioner to consider application.

Upon receipt of an application to organize and establish a savings bank, the commissioner shall examine or cause to be examined all the relevant facts connected with the formation of the proposed savings bank. If it appears to the commissioner that the proposed savings bank has complied with all the requirements set forth in this chapter and the rules and regulations for the formation of a savings bank and is otherwise lawfully entitled to be organized and established as a savings bank, the commissioner shall present the application to the board for its consideration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-63.
Criteria to be met before commissioner may recommend approval of application.

The commissioner may recommend approval of an application to form a mutual savings bank only when all of the following criteria are met:

The proposed savings bank has an operational expense fund from which to pay organizational and incorporation expenses in an amount determined by the commissioner to be sufficient for the safe and proper operation of the savings bank; provided, however, that such expense fund shall not contain less than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00). The monies remaining in such expense fund shall be held by the savings bank for at least one (1) year from its date of licensing. No portion of such fund shall be released to an incorporator or director who contributed to it, nor to any other contributor, nor to any other person, and no dividends shall be accrued or paid on such funds without the prior approval of the commissioner.

The proposed savings bank has pledges for deposit accounts in the amount determined by the commissioner sufficient for the safe and proper operation of the savings bank. However, the amount of such pledges for any savings bank, except for a savings bank which was converted from an existing financial institution, shall not be less than the amount required to obtain insurance of deposit accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

All entrance fees for deposit accounts of the proposed savings bank have been made with legal tender of the United States.

The name of the proposed savings bank will not mislead the public and is not the same as, or so similar to, the name of an existing depository institution as to mislead the public.

The character, general fitness and responsibility of the incorporators and the initial board of directors of the proposed savings bank, a majority of whom shall be residents of Mississippi, command the confidence of the community in which the proposed savings bank intends to locate.

There is a reasonable demand and necessity in the community which will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank.

The public convenience and advantage will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank.

The proposed savings bank will have a reasonable probability of sustaining profitable and beneficial operations in the community.

The proposed savings bank, if established, will promote the healthy and effective competition in the community by the delivery to the public of savings institution services.

The commissioner may recommend approval of an application to form a stock savings bank only when all the following criteria are met:

The proposed savings bank has prepared a plan to solicit subscriptions for capital stock in an amount determined by the commissioner to be sufficient for the safe and proper operation of the savings bank. However, the amount of such subscriptions for any savings bank, except for a savings bank which was converted from an existing financial institution, shall not be less than the amount required to obtain insurance of deposit accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

The name of the proposed savings bank will not mislead the public and is not the same as, or so similar to, the name of an existing depository institution as to mislead the public.

The character, general fitness and responsibility of the incorporators, initial board of directors and initial stockholders of the proposed savings bank command the confidence of the community in which the proposed institution intends to locate.

There is a reasonable demand and necessity in the community which will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank.

The public convenience and advantage will be served by the establishment of the proposed savings bank.

The proposed savings bank will have a reasonable probability of sustaining profitable and beneficial operations in the community.

The proposed savings bank, if established, will promote healthy and effective competition in the community in the delivery to the public of savings institution services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-65.
Board to review findings and recommendations of commissioner.

If the commissioner does not have the completed application within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing of the preliminary application, the application shall be returned to the applicants.

When the commissioner has completed his examination and investigation of the facts relevant to the establishment of the proposed savings bank, he shall present his findings and recommendations to the board at a public hearing. The board must approve or reject an application within one hundred eighty (180) days of the submission of the preliminary application.

Not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the public hearing held for the consideration of the application to establish a savings bank, the incorporators shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the area to be served by the proposed savings bank. Such notice shall contain:

A statement that the application has been filed with the commissioner;

The name of the community where the principal office of the proposed savings bank intends to locate;

A statement that a public hearing shall be held to consider the application;

A statement that any interested or affected party may file a written statement either favoring or protesting the creation of the proposed savings bank. Such statement must be filed with the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the date of publication; and

When a certificate of incorporation is sought in order to effect the acquisition of an insolvent financial institution that is being sold pursuant to the provisions of state or federal law, any constraints of time imposed herein shall not apply if the commissioner determines that an emergency exists which requires expedition in granting a certificate in order to protect the interests of the public and the interests of the depositors and creditors of the financial institution.

The board, at the public hearing, shall consider the findings and recommendation of the commissioner and shall hear such oral testimony as the commissioner may wish to give or be called upon to give, and shall also receive information and hear testimony from the incorporators of the proposed savings bank and from any and all other interested or affected parties. The board shall hear only testimony and receive only information which is relevant to the consideration of the application and the operation of the proposed savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-67.
Grounds for approval or denial of application.

After consideration of the findings and recommendation of the commissioner and his oral testimony, if any, and the consideration of such other information and evidence, either written or oral, as has come before it at the public hearing, the board shall approve or disapprove the application within thirty (30) days after the public hearing. The board shall approve the application if it finds that the certificate of incorporation is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

If the board approves the application, the commissioner shall so notify the Secretary of State with a certificate of approval, accompanied by the original of the certificate of incorporation and the two (2) copies.

Upon receipt of the certificate of approval, the original of the certificate of incorporation, and the two (2) copies, the Secretary of State shall, upon the payment by the newly chartered savings bank of the appropriate organization tax and fees, file the certificate of incorporation. He shall certify under his official seal the two (2) copies of the certificate of incorporation, one (1) of which shall be forwarded to the incorporators or their representative, the other shall be forwarded to the office of the commissioner for filing. Upon the recordation of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, the savings bank shall be a body politic and corporate under the name stated in such certificate, and shall be authorized to begin the savings bank business when duly licensed by the commissioner.

The said certificate of incorporation, or a copy thereof, duly certified by the Secretary of State, or by the register of deeds of the county where the savings bank is located, or by the commissioner, under their respective seals, shall be evidence in all courts, and shall, in all judicial proceedings, be deemed prima facie evidence of the complete organization and incorporation of the savings bank purporting thereby to have been established.

After approval of the application, the commissioner shall supervise and monitor the organization process. He shall ensure that sufficient pledges for deposit accounts or subscriptions for capital stock, as well as insurance of deposit accounts, have been secured by the organizers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-69.
Appeal.

The final decision of the board may be appealed by an applicant for a charter in accordance with Section 81-14-175.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-71.
Insurance of accounts required.

All state savings banks must obtain and maintain insurance on all members’ and customers’ deposit accounts from an insurance corporation created by an act of Congress. Prior to the licensing of a savings bank, a certificate of incorporation duly recorded under the provisions of Section 81-19-67(3) shall be deemed to be sufficient certification to the insurance corporation that must be obtained within the time limit prescribed hereinafter. Subject to the rules and regulations of the commissioner, a state savings bank may obtain or participate in efforts to obtain insurance of deposits that is in excess of the amount eligible for federal insurance of accounts. Such insurance shall be known as “excess insurance.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-73.
Status as IRS qualified thrift institution.

All state savings banks must qualify for and maintain eligibility for the bad debt reserve under Section 7701(a)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1968 and any amendments thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws of 1997, ch. 364, § 16; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-75.
Time allowed to commence business.

A newly chartered savings bank shall commence business within one (1) year after the date upon which its corporate existence was begun. A savings bank which does not commence business within such time shall forfeit its corporate existence, unless the commissioner, upon written request from the savings bank, approves an extension of time before the expiration of such one-year period. If the corporate existence is forfeited, the certificate of incorporation shall expire and any action taken in connection with the incorporation and chartering of the savings bank, with the exception of fees paid to the department, shall become null and void. The commissioner shall determine if a savings bank has failed to commence business within one (1) year, without extension as provided in this section, and shall notify the Secretary of State and the registrar of deeds in the county in which the savings bank is located that the certificate of incorporation has expired.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 17; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-77.
Licensing.

A newly chartered savings bank shall be entitled to a license fee to operate upon payment to the department of the appropriate license fee as prescribed by the commissioner and upon evidence presented to the commissioner of the following:

Capable, efficient and equitable management;

Organization of the savings bank pursuant to law;

Completion of the organization of the savings bank; and

Passage of final inspection by the commissioner or his representative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 18; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-79.
Amendments to certificate of incorporation.

Any amendment to the certificate of incorporation of a state savings bank shall be made at any annual or special meeting of such savings bank upon approval by a majority of votes or shares cast by members or stockholders present in person or by proxy at such meeting. Any amendment shall be certified by the appropriate corporate official, submitted to the commissioner for his approval or rejection, and if approved, then certified by the commissioner and recorded as provided in Section 81-14-67 for certificates of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 19; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-81.
List of stockholders to be maintained.

Every stock savings bank organized and operated under the provisions of this chapter shall at all times keep a current list of the names of all its stockholders. Whenever called upon by the commissioner, a stock savings bank shall file in the office of the commissioner a correct list of all its stockholders, the resident address of each, the number of shares of stock held by each, and the dates of issue.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 20; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-83.
Branch offices.

Any state savings bank may apply to the commissioner for permission to establish a branch office. The application shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the commissioner and shall be approved or denied by the commissioner within one hundred twenty (120) days of filing.

The commissioner shall approve a branch application when all of the following criteria are met:

The applicant has gross assets of at least Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00);

The applicant has evidenced financial responsibility;

The applicant has a net worth equal to or exceeding the amount required by the insurer of deposit accounts;

The applicant has an acceptable internal control system. Such a system would include certain basic internal control requirements essential to the protection of assets and the promotion of operational efficiency regardless of the size of the applicant.

Upon receipt of a branch application, the commissioner shall examine all the relevant facts connected with the establishment of the proposed branch office. If it appears to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the applicant has complied with all the requirements set forth in this section and the regulations for the establishment of a branch office, and that the savings bank is otherwise lawfully entitled to establish such branch office, then the commissioner shall approve the branch application.

Within ten (10) days after the filing of the branch application with the commissioner, the applicant shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the area to be served by the proposed branch office. Such notice shall contain:

A statement that the branch application has been filed with the commissioner;

The proposed address of the branch office, including city or town and street; and

A statement that any interested party may file a written statement with the commissioner, within thirty (30) days of the date of the publication of the notice, protesting the establishment of the proposed branch office and requesting a hearing before the commissioner.

Any interested party may file a written statement with the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the date of initial publication of the branch application notice, protesting the establishment of the proposed branch office and requesting a hearing before the commissioner. If a hearing is held on the branch application, the commissioner shall only receive information and hear testimony from the applicant and from any interested party which is relevant to the branch application and the operation of the proposed branch office. The commissioner shall issue his final decision on the branch application within thirty (30) days following the hearing.

If a hearing is not held on the branch application, the commissioner shall issue his final decision within one hundred twenty (120) days of the filing of the application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 21; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 143; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 21; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-85.
Request to change location of branch or principal office.

The board of directors of a state savings bank may change the location of a branch office or the principal office of the savings bank with the prior written approval of the commissioner. The commissioner may request, and the savings bank shall provide, such information as the commissioner determines necessary to evaluate the request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 22; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-87.
Approval revoked; branch office.

The commissioner may, for good cause and after a hearing, order the closing of a branch office. Such order shall be made in writing to the savings bank and shall fix a reasonable time to close the branch office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 144; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-89.
Branch offices closed.

No branch office in this state may be discontinued or abandoned without the consent in writing of the commissioner first obtained.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 24; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-91.
Loan production office.

A state savings bank may open or close a loan production office with the prior written approval of the commissioner. The commissioner may request, and the savings bank shall provide, such information as the commissioner determines necessary to evaluate the request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2001.